Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 5651.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Vermont Arbitration Act.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 95

, § 2.

§ 5652.
Validity of arbitration agreements.

General rule. Unless otherwise provided in the agreement, a written agreement to submit any existing controversy to arbitration or a provision in a written contract to submit to arbitration any controversy thereafter arising between the parties creates a duty to arbitrate, and is valid, enforceable, and irrevocable, except upon such grounds as exist for the revocation of a contract.

Required provision. No agreement to arbitrate is enforceable unless accompanied by or containing a written acknowledgment of arbitration signed by each of the parties or their representatives. When contained in the same document as the agreement to arbitrate, that acknowledgment shall be displayed prominently. The acknowledgment shall provide substantially as follows:

“ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF ARBITRATION.

I understand that (this agreement/my agreement with
of
) contains an agreement to arbitrate.
After signing (this/that) document, I understand that I will not be able to bring a lawsuit concerning any dispute that may arise which is covered by the arbitration agreement, unless it involves a question of constitutional or civil rights.
Instead, I agree to submit any such dispute to an impartial arbitrator.”

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 95

, § 2.

§ 5653.
Limitations.

This chapter applies to all arbitration agreements to the extent not inconsistent with the laws of the United States. However, this chapter does not apply to labor interest arbitration, nor to arbitration agreements contained in a contract of insurance, nor to grievance arbitration under 3 V.S.A. chapter 28. “Labor interest arbitration” means the method of concluding labor negotiations by having a disinterested person determine what will be the terms of an agreement.

No arbitration agreement shall have the effect of preventing a person from seeking or obtaining the assistance of the courts in enforcing his or her constitutional or civil rights.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 95

§ 2; amended

1997, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 5654.
Uniformity of interpretation.

This chapter shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it or substantially similar provisions.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 95

, § 2.

§ 5655.
Representation by attorney.

A party has the right to be represented by an attorney at any proceeding or hearing under this subchapter.
A waiver thereof prior to the proceeding or hearing is ineffective.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 95

, § 2.